tex/old/pt_BR.aff
SFX I Y 465
SFX I  ar   á   ar
SFX I  er   ê  [^l]er
SFX I  ir   í   ir
SFX I  or   ô   or
SFX I   0       a          [ei]ar
SFX I   0       a          udar
SFX I   0       am         [ei]ar
SFX I   0       am         udar
SFX I   0       as         [ei]ar
SFX I   0       as         udar
SFX I   0       des        [ei]ar
SFX I   0       des        dar
SFX I   0       des        star
SFX I   0       ei         [ei]ar
SFX I   0       ei         dar
SFX I   0       ei         star
SFX I   0       eis        [ei]ar
SFX I   0       eis        dar
SFX I   0       eis        star
SFX I   0       em         [ei]ar
SFX I   0       em         dar
SFX I   0       em         star
SFX I   0       emos       [ei]ar
SFX I   0       emos       dar
SFX I   0       emos       star
SFX I   0       es         [ei]ar
SFX I   0       es         dar
SFX I   0       es         star
SFX I   0       ia         [ei]ar
SFX I   0       ia         dar
SFX I   0       ia         star
SFX I   0       iam        [ei]ar
SFX I   0       iam        dar
SFX I   0       iam        star
SFX I   0       ias        [ei]ar
SFX I   0       ias        dar
SFX I   0       ias        star
SFX I   0       mos        [ei]ar
SFX I   0       mos        dar
SFX I   0       mos        star
SFX I   0       á          [ei]ar
SFX I   0       á          dar
SFX I   0       á          star
SFX I   0       ás         [ei]ar
SFX I   0       ás         dar
SFX I   0       ás         star
SFX I   0       ão         [ei]ar
SFX I   0       ão         dar
SFX I   0       ão         star
SFX I   0       íamos      [ei]ar
SFX I   0       íamos      dar
SFX I   0       íamos      star
SFX I   0       íeis       [ei]ar
SFX I   0       íeis       dar
SFX I   0       íeis       star
SFX I   ar      ei         dar
SFX I   ar      ei         [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      eis        dar
SFX I   ar      eis        [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      eja        star
SFX I   ar      ejais      star
SFX I   ar      ejam       star
SFX I   ar      ejamos     star
SFX I   ar      ejas       star
SFX I   ar      emos       dar
SFX I   ar      emos       [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      er         dar
SFX I   ar      era        dar
SFX I   ar      eram       dar
SFX I   ar      eras       dar
SFX I   ar      erdes      dar
SFX I   ar      erem       dar
SFX I   ar      eres       dar
SFX I   ar      ermos      dar
SFX I   ar      esse       dar
SFX I   ar      essem      dar
SFX I   ar      esses      dar
SFX I   ar      este       dar
SFX I   ar      estes      dar
SFX I   ar      eu         dar
SFX I   ar      eve        star
SFX I   ar      ia         ear
SFX I   ar      iam        ear
SFX I   ar      ias        ear
SFX I   ar      ie         ear
SFX I   ar      iem        ear
SFX I   ar      ies        ear
SFX I   ar      io         ear
SFX I   ar      ive        star
SFX I   ar      ivemos     star
SFX I   ar      iver       star
SFX I   ar      ivera      star
SFX I   ar      iveram     star
SFX I   ar      iveras     star
SFX I   ar      iverdes    star
SFX I   ar      iverem     star
SFX I   ar      iveres     star
SFX I   ar      ivermos    star
SFX I   ar      ivesse     star
SFX I   ar      ivessem    star
SFX I   ar      ivesses    star
SFX I   ar      iveste     star
SFX I   ar      ivestes    star
SFX I   ar      ivéramos   star
SFX I   ar      ivéreis    star
SFX I   ar      ivésseis   star
SFX I   ar      ivéssemos  star
SFX I   ar      ou         [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      ou         dar
SFX I   ar      ou         star
SFX I   ar      á          dar
SFX I   ar      á          star
SFX I   ar      áramos     [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      áramos     udar
SFX I   ar      áreis      [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      áreis      udar
SFX I   ar      ás         dar
SFX I   ar      ás         star
SFX I   ar      ásseis     [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      ásseis     udar
SFX I   ar      ássemos    [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      ássemos    udar
SFX I   ar      ávamos     [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      ávamos     dar
SFX I   ar      ávamos     star
SFX I   ar      áveis      [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      áveis      dar
SFX I   ar      áveis      star
SFX I   ar      ão         dar
SFX I   ar      ão         star
SFX I   ar      éramos     dar
SFX I   ar      éreis      dar
SFX I   ar      ésseis     dar
SFX I   ar      éssemos    dar
SFX I   ar      ê          dar
SFX I   ar      êem        dar
SFX I   ar      ês         dar
SFX I   iar     eia        iar
SFX I   iar     eiam       iar
SFX I   iar     eias       iar
SFX I   iar     eie        iar
SFX I   iar     eiem       iar
SFX I   iar     eies       iar
SFX I   iar     eio        iar
SFX I   oiar    óia        oiar
SFX I   oiar    óiam       oiar
SFX I   oiar    óias       oiar
SFX I   oiar    óie        oiar
SFX I   oiar    óiem       oiar
SFX I   oiar    óies       oiar
SFX I   oiar    óio        oiar
SFX I   r       do         [ei]ar
SFX I   r       dos        [ei]ar
SFX I   r       da         [ei]ar
SFX I   r       das        [ei]ar
SFX I   r       do         dar
SFX I   r       dos        dar
SFX I   r       da         dar
SFX I   r       das        dar
SFX I   r       do         star
SFX I   r       dos        star
SFX I   r       da         star
SFX I   r       das        star
SFX I   r       do         udar
SFX I   r       dos        udar
SFX I   r       da         udar
SFX I   r       das        udar
SFX I   r       i          [ei]ar
SFX I   r       i          dar
SFX I   r       i          star
SFX I   r       is         [ei]ar
SFX I   r       is         dar
SFX I   r       is         star
SFX I   r       mos        [ei]ar
SFX I   r       mos        dar
SFX I   r       mos        star
SFX I   r       mos        udar
SFX I   r       ndo        [ei]ar
SFX I   r       ndo        dar
SFX I   r       ndo        star
SFX I   r       sse        [ei]ar
SFX I   r       sse        udar
SFX I   r       ssem       [ei]ar
SFX I   r       ssem       udar
SFX I   r       sses       [ei]ar
SFX I   r       sses       udar
SFX I   r       ste        [ei]ar
SFX I   r       ste        udar
SFX I   r       stes       [ei]ar
SFX I   r       stes       udar
SFX I   r       va         [ei]ar
SFX I   r       va         dar
SFX I   r       va         star
SFX I   r       vam        [ei]ar
SFX I   r       vam        dar
SFX I   r       vam        star
SFX I   r       vas        [ei]ar
SFX I   r       vas        dar
SFX I   r       vas        star
SFX I   udar    úda        udar
SFX I   udar    údam       udar
SFX I   udar    údas       udar
SFX I   udar    úde        udar
SFX I   udar    údem       udar
SFX I   udar    údes       udar
SFX I   udar    údo        udar
SFX I   er      ê          ler
SFX I   r       de         ler
SFX I   r       des        ler
SFX I   er      êem        ler
SFX I   r       ia         ler
SFX I   r       iais       ler
SFX I   r       iam        ler
SFX I   r       iamos      ler
SFX I   r       ias        ler
SFX I   r       io         ler
SFX I   r       mos        ler
SFX I   r       ndo        ler
SFX I   0       a          ler
SFX I   0       á          ler
SFX I   0       am         ler
SFX I   er      êramos     ler
SFX I   0       ão         ler
SFX I   0       as         ler
SFX I   0       ás         ler
SFX I   0       des        ler
SFX I   0       ei         ler
SFX I   0       eis        ler
SFX I   er      êreis      ler
SFX I   0       em         ler
SFX I   0       emos       ler
SFX I   0       es         ler
SFX I   0       ia         ler
SFX I   0       iam        ler
SFX I   0       íamos      ler
SFX I   0       ias        ler
SFX I   0       íeis       ler
SFX I   0       mos        ler
SFX I   er      ês         ler
SFX I   r       sse        ler
SFX I   er      êsseis     ler
SFX I   r       ssem       ler
SFX I   er      êssemos    ler
SFX I   r       sses       ler
SFX I   r       ste        ler
SFX I   r       stes       ler
SFX I   r       u          ler
SFX I   er      i          ler
SFX I   er      ia         ler
SFX I   er      iam        ler
SFX I   er      íamos      ler
SFX I   er      ias        ler
SFX I   er      ido        ler
SFX I   er      idos       ler
SFX I   er      ida        ler
SFX I   er      idas       ler
SFX I   er      íeis       ler
SFX I   ir      e          servir
SFX I   ir      em         servir
SFX I   ir      es         servir
SFX I   r       0          servir
SFX I   r       a          servir
SFX I   r       am         servir
SFX I   ir      íamos      servir
SFX I   r       as         servir
SFX I   r       do         servir
SFX I   r       dos        servir
SFX I   r       da         servir
SFX I   r       das        servir
SFX I   ir      íeis       servir
SFX I   r       mos        servir
SFX I   r       ndo        servir
SFX I   0       a          servir
SFX I   0       á          servir
SFX I   0       am         servir
SFX I   ir      íramos     servir
SFX I   0       ão         servir
SFX I   0       as         servir
SFX I   0       ás         servir
SFX I   0       des        servir
SFX I   0       ei         servir
SFX I   0       eis        servir
SFX I   ir      íreis      servir
SFX I   0       em         servir
SFX I   0       emos       servir
SFX I   0       es         servir
SFX I   0       ia         servir
SFX I   0       iam        servir
SFX I   0       íamos      servir
SFX I   0       ias        servir
SFX I   0       íeis       servir
SFX I   0       mos        servir
SFX I   r       s          servir
SFX I   r       sse        servir
SFX I   ir      ísseis     servir
SFX I   r       ssem       servir
SFX I   ir      íssemos    servir
SFX I   r       sses       servir
SFX I   r       ste        servir
SFX I   r       stes       servir
SFX I   r       u          servir
SFX I   ervir   irva       servir
SFX I   ervir   irvas      servir
SFX I   ervir   irvam      servir
SFX I   ervir   irvamos    servir
SFX I   ervir   irvais     servir
SFX I   ervir   irvo       servir
SFX I   r       0          saber
SFX I   r       i          saber
SFX I   r       is         saber
SFX I   r       m          saber
SFX I   r       mos        saber
SFX I   r       ndo        saber
SFX I   0       á          saber
SFX I   0       ão         saber
SFX I   0       ás         saber
SFX I   0       des        saber
SFX I   0       ei         saber
SFX I   0       eis        saber
SFX I   0       em         saber
SFX I   0       emos       saber
SFX I   0       es         saber
SFX I   0       ia         saber
SFX I   0       iam        saber
SFX I   0       íamos      saber
SFX I   0       ias        saber
SFX I   0       íeis       saber
SFX I   0       mos        saber
SFX I   r       s          saber
SFX I   er      ia         saber
SFX I   er      iam        saber
SFX I   er      íamos      saber
SFX I   er      ias        saber
SFX I   er      ida        saber
SFX I   er      idas       saber
SFX I   er      ido        saber
SFX I   er      idos       saber
SFX I   er      íeis       saber
SFX I   ber     iba        saber
SFX I   ber     ibais      saber
SFX I   ber     ibam       saber
SFX I   ber     ibamos     saber
SFX I   ber     ibas       saber
SFX I   aber    ei         saber
SFX I   aber    oube       saber
SFX I   aber    oubemos    saber
SFX I   aber    ouber      saber
SFX I   aber    oubera     saber
SFX I   aber    ouberam    saber
SFX I   aber    oubéramos  saber
SFX I   aber    ouberas    saber
SFX I   aber    ouberdes   saber
SFX I   aber    oubéreis   saber
SFX I   aber    ouberem    saber
SFX I   aber    ouberes    saber
SFX I   aber    oubermos   saber
SFX I   aber    oubesse    saber
SFX I   aber    oubésseis  saber
SFX I   aber    oubessem   saber
SFX I   aber    oubéssemos saber
SFX I   aber    oubesses   saber
SFX I   aber    oubeste    saber
SFX I   aber    oubestes   saber
SFX I   der     ca         perder
SFX I   der     cais       perder
SFX I   der     cam        perder
SFX I   der     camos      perder
SFX I   der     cas        perder
SFX I   der     co         perder
SFX I   r       0          perder
SFX I   r       i          perder
